Illinois, session 104th, HB3823.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-68 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-68 new)7    Sec. 10-68. Pathways for Community Integration Network.8    (a) The Pathways for Community Integration Network (PCIN) 9program is established within the Department of Human 10Services. The program shall create a network of multilingual 11community integration providers providing access to an array 12of services to remove barriers to opportunity and to foster 13pathways to safety, well-being, and economic security for the 14State's Limited English Proficient (LEP) and related 15populations.16    (b) PCIN model. Each PCIN organization must adhere to the 17PCIN model and, with partner organizations, deliver the full 18model of care. The PCIN model of care includes the following 19components:20        (1) Comprehensive case management. Comprehensive case 21    management shall be driven by a holistic household level 22    needs assessment. Case management is family based and 23    trauma informed and is geared toward self-sufficiency and   HB3823 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 12278 KTG 22391 b1    community integration.2        (2) Core integrated services:3            (A) trauma-informed family-based case management;4            (B) access to health care coverage navigation;5            (C) access to counseling and behavioral health 6        services (including peer support models);7            (D) career development and job readiness; and8            (E) legal assistance.9        If the PCIN organization does not provide all services 10    outlined in subparagraphs (A) through (E), then it shall 11    refer clients to partner organizations with which the PCIN 12    has established relationships or that are part of the 13    Community Alliance, to provide such services. PCINs are 14    encouraged to use a co-location model, which may include 15    partner or Community Alliance organizations offering 16    services at their locations, when practicable. All 17    services should be provided based on the individual 18    client's needs.19        (3) Co-location of services. To maximize resources and 20    provide holistic care, the PCIN organization shall 21    leverage publicly and privately funded services to address 22    the needs of the client population that are encouraged to 23    be provided onsite when practicable.24        (4) Community education. The PCIN shall coordinate 25    workshops, training, and technical assistance 26    opportunities to build the capacity of LEP and related   HB3823 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 12278 KTG 22391 b1    populations in the community and the community providers 2    or institutions that work with them. Community education 3    shall focus on areas that increase community integration 4    and improve engagement.5        (5) Community Alliance. The PCIN shall establish and 6    facilitate a community planning group which may bring 7    together local actors, including local government, 8    schools, colleges, community-business organizations, 9    health facilities, and others, to respond to emergent 10    issues relevant to LEP and related populations in the 11    community, and develop services, programs, initiatives, 12    and policies that improve supports and community 13    integration for these individuals and families.14    (c) PCIN capacity building. As deemed necessary, the 15Department may facilitate engagement between PCIN 16organizations and technical assistance providers to build the 17capacity of PCIN organizations and the network as a whole.18    (d) PCIN certification. The Department shall establish a 19PCIN formal certification process that outlines the standards 20for recognition within 2 years of the PCIN program's 21implementation. A community organization must demonstrate 22capacity to deliver all program components outlined in this 23Section to be awarded certification and be formally recognized 24as a PCIN provider. 25    (e) Rules. The Department may adopt any rules necessary to 26implement the PCIN program.